District of Columbia statutes.
48-906.02

Continuation of orders and rules.

Any orders and rules issued under any law affected by this chapter and in effect on August 5, 1981, and not in conflict with it, continue in effect until modified, superseded, or repealed.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, § 602, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-562.